Arkansas, session 2025, HB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-60-102 is repealed.
5-60-102. Prohibition on sales and distribution of novelty lighters.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “novelty lighter” means a product
commonly used by consumers to ignite cigarettes, cigars, pipes, gas grills,
or other combustible material that has entertaining audio or visual features
that depict or resemble in physical form or function articles commonly
recognized as appealing to or intended for use by children ten (10) years of
age or younger, including without limitation lighters that depict or resemble
cartoon characters, toys, guns, watches, musical instruments, vehicles, toy
animals, food, or beverages or that play musical notes or have flashing
lights or other entertaining features.
(2) “Novelty lighter” does not include:
(A) A lighter manufactured before 1980; or
(B) A lighter that lacks a device necessary to produce
combustion or a flame.
(b)(1) The retail sale, offer of retail sale, gift, or distribution of
*CEB019*
12/06/2024 3:12:54 PM CEB019

HB1553
any novelty lighter in Arkansas is prohibited.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply to a
novelty lighter that is:
(A) Being actively transported through the state; or
(B) Located in a warehouse closed to the public for
purposes of retail sales.
(c) A person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found
guilty of violating this section is guilty of a violation and shall be
punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more
than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense and shall pay court costs.


























12/06/2024 3:12:54 PM